Utah statutes.
75-3-604.   Bond amount -- Security -- Procedure -- Reduction.
If bond is required and the provisions of the will or order do not specify the
amount, unless stated in his application or petition, the person qualifying
shall file a statement under oath with the clerk indicating his best estimate
of the value of the personal and real estate of the decedent and of the income
expected from the personal and real estate during the next year, and he shall
execute and file a bond with the clerk, or give other suitable security, in an
amount not less than the estimate reduced by the amount of secured claims
against such property. The clerk shall determine that the bond is duly
executed by a corporate surety, or one or more individual sureties whose
performance is secured by pledge of personal property, mortgage on real
property, or other adequate security. The clerk may permit the amount of the
bond to be reduced by the value of assets of the estate deposited with a
domestic financial institution (as defined in Section 75-6-101) in a manner
that prevents their unauthorized disposition. On petition of the personal
representative or another interested person the court may excuse a requirement
of bond, increase or reduce the amount of the bond, release sureties, or
permit the substitution of another bond with the same or different sureties.
